Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. Enforcement.

Sec. 08.98.230.
Injunction. [Repealed, § 16 ch 130 SLA 1980. For current law, see AS 08.98.235.]

Sec. 08.98.235.
Grounds for imposition of disciplinary sanctions.

After a hearing, the board may impose a disciplinary sanction on a person licensed under this chapter when the board finds that the person

secured a license through deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation;

engaged in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation in the course of providing professional services or engaging in professional activities;

advertised professional services in a false or misleading manner;

has been convicted of a felony or other crime which affects the person’s ability to continue to practice competently and safely;

intentionally or negligently engaged in or permitted the performance of animal care by the person’s supervisees which does not conform to minimum professional standards regardless of whether actual injury to the animal occurred;

failed to comply with this chapter, with a regulation adopted under this chapter, or with an order of the board;

continued to practice after becoming unfit due to

professional incompetence;

addiction or severe dependency on alcohol or other drugs which impairs the person’s ability to practice safely;

physical or mental disability;

engaged in lewd or immoral conduct in connection with the delivery of professional service;

prescribed or dispensed an opioid in excess of the maximum dosage authorized under AS

08.98.245

;

procured, sold, prescribed, or dispensed drugs in violation of a law, regardless of whether there has been a criminal action.

History.

(§ 13 ch 130 SLA 1980; am § 32 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For disciplinary powers of board, see AS

08.01.075

.

Administrative Code. —

For standards of practice, see 12 AAC 68, art. 2.

For veterinary technicians, see 12 AAC 68, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 26, 2017, added (9) and (10), and made a related change.

Sec. 08.98.240.
Disciplinary sanctions. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.075.]

Sec. 08.98.245.
Maximum dosage for opioid prescriptions.

A veterinarian may not issue an initial prescription for an opioid that exceeds a seven- day supply to the owner of an animal patient for outpatient use.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a veterinarian may issue a prescription for an opioid that exceeds a seven-day supply to the owner of an animal if the veterinarian determines that more than a seven-day supply of an opioid is necessary

to treat the animal’s medical condition or for chronic pain management; the veterinarian may write a prescription for an opioid for the quantity needed to treat the animal’s medical condition or chronic pain; the veterinarian shall document in the animal’s medical record the condition triggering the prescription of an opioid in a quantity that exceeds a seven-day supply and indicate that a nonopioid alternative was not appropriate to address the medical condition; or

for an owner who is unable to access a veterinarian or pharmacist within the time necessary for a refill of the seven-day supply because of a logistical or travel barrier; the veterinarian may write a prescription for an opioid for the quantity needed to treat the animal for the time that the owner is unable to access a veterinarian or pharmacist; the veterinarian shall document in the animal’s medical record the reason for the prescription of an opioid in a quantity that exceeds a seven-day supply and indicate that a nonopioid alternative was not appropriate to address the medical condition.

History.

(§ 33 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent regarding this section, see sec. 1, ch. 2, SSSLA 2017 in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 33, ch. 2, SSSLA 2017, which enacted this section, took effect on July 26, 2017.